lang/common/courses/xfst-lexc/d.xfscript
! Sets
define Vow [a|e|o|u|i|y|æ|ø|å] ;
define Cns [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z] ;
define AuxiliarySigns %> ;

! Rules

define FinalY y -> i e || Cns _ %> Cns ;
define FinalM m -> 0 || m _ .#. ;

define Cleanup %> -> 0 ;

! Compilation

read regex [
    FinalY
.o. FinalM
.o. Cleanup
] ;

save stack d.xfst.hfst
